Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 22

Farm Bureau

43-22-101. Use of words “farm bureau” restricted to Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation.

The use of the words “farm bureau” by any person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, or other business enterprise doing business in the state of Tennessee, except by the Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation, or its subsidiaries, or affiliate associations, is unlawful.

Acts 1949, ch. 46, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.42 (Williams, § 11412.16); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2301.

Cross-References. Agriculture commodities promotion, title 43, ch. 29.

Law Reviews.

Property Rights vs. Public Use: Analyzing Tennessee's Response to Kelo Eminent Domain Ruling (Scott Griswold), 43 Tenn B.J. 14 (2007).

Cited: Alfred v. Tennessee Farmers Mut. Ins. Co., 8 F. Supp. 2d 1024, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 22655 (E.D. Tenn. 1997).

Comparative Legislation. Farm bureau:

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 247.240 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 79-17-11 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-73.1 et seq.

Collateral References. 3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 58 et seq.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture § 8.

Agriculture
2.

43-22-102. Other uses of words “farm bureau” unlawful — Exception.

The use of the words “farm bureau,” either preceded by or followed by the name of any state, county, or town, or by any word designating a product, service, activity, or enterprise in the state of Tennessee, is unlawful; provided, that this shall not limit nor affect the right of the Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation, or any of its affiliate associations, to the free use of such words.

Acts 1949, ch. 46, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.43 (Williams, § 11412.17); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2302.

43-22-103. Federation's permission to use words — Methods of exercising.

The Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation may authorize its affiliate or associate organizations, services, or activities to use the words “farm bureau” by resolution duly adopted and spread upon the minutes of its board of directors, a certified copy of which shall be filed with the secretary of state before these words shall be used by any other than the Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation.

Acts 1949, ch. 46, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.44 (Williams, § 11412.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2303.

43-22-104. Penalty for violation.

Any person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation violating any of the provisions of this chapter commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1949, ch. 46, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.45 (Williams, § 11412.19); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2304; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.